Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6526
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Defense Efforts Workforce Act, the definitions found in sections 77-6527 to 77-6537 shall be used.

Laws 2025, LB649, § 3.
July 1, 2027